North Carolina, session 2025, SB975.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Short Title. – This act shall be known as the State Digital Asset
Payments Study Act.
SECTION 2. Definition. – In this act, "digital asset" means a fungible,
blockchain-based digital representation of value designed for use as a medium of exchange or
settlement instrument and capable of being transmitted, stored, or traded electronically. The term
does not include non-fungible tokens, digital collectibles, tokenized artwork, or any digital asset
primarily marketed or structured as a speculative investment or unique collectible item. The term
also does not include a central bank digital currency, as defined in G.S. 147-86.19(a).
SECTION 3. Legislative Findings and Purpose. – The General Assembly finds all
of the following:
(1) The State of North Carolina seeks to modernize government payment systems
while minimizing fiscal, cybersecurity, and operational risk.
(2) Certain digital assets and blockchain-based payment technologies are
supported by mature, regulated payment infrastructure.
(3) Evaluating digital asset payment technologies based on objective liquidity,
stability, and regulatory criteria is necessary to ensure responsible
policymaking.
(4) A significant number of North Carolina residents regularly send money to
family members and dependents outside the United States.
(5) Remittance transactions often carry fees, foreign exchange spreads, and other
transaction costs that materially reduce the amount received by intended
recipients.
(6) These transaction costs operate as a recurring financial burden on working
households in North Carolina and reduce the effective value of wages earned
in this State.
(7) The cumulative impact of remittance fees represents a meaningful outflow of
household income from North Carolina communities, reducing disposable
income available for local spending, savings, and economic activity within the
State.
*S975-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
The purpose of this act is to establish a two-part statewide study: (i) a study of the
acceptance of digital asset payments for certain State fees and (ii) a study of household remittance
costs and international payment mechanisms that may reduce transaction costs for North Carolina
residents, while maintaining appropriate consumer protections, financial stability, and regulatory
compliance.
SECTION 4.(a) State Fees Digital Asset Payments Study. – The Department of State
Treasurer shall conduct a comprehensive study to evaluate the feasibility, risks, and potential
benefits of accepting digital assets as a method of payment for selected State fees. In conducting
the study, the Department shall consult with relevant State agencies and constitutional officers
whose systems, oversight responsibilities, or regulatory authority may be implicated, including
the following:
(1) The Department of Information Technology, regarding cybersecurity
architecture and systems integration.
(2) The Office of the State Controller, regarding accounting, reconciliation, and
financial reporting systems.
(3) The Office of State Budget and Management, regarding fiscal impact analysis
and budgetary considerations.
(4) The Department of Justice, regarding legal compliance and regulatory
interpretation.
(5) State agencies that administer fee-based payment portals, including the
Division of Motor Vehicles of the Department of Transportation and the
Department of the Secretary of State.
SECTION 4.(b) Scope. – The study required by this section includes, at a minimum,
evaluation of the following:
(1) Operational and technological requirements for accepting digital asset
payments through third-party payment processors that immediately convert
digital assets into United States dollars.
(2) Cybersecurity, fraud-prevention, and transaction-monitoring considerations.
(3) Banking, settlement, and reconciliation impacts, including the role of
federally and State-chartered financial institutions.
(4) Regulatory considerations under State and federal law, including anti-money
laundering, sanctions compliance, and consumer protection requirements.
(5) Criteria for determining which digital assets may be appropriate for potential
acceptance, including objective measures of liquidity, stability, and regulatory
status.
(6) The potential role of U.S. dollar-denominated, fully reserved stablecoins
issued by entities subject to regulatory oversight.
(7) Estimated implementation costs and potential administrative impacts.
The study shall prioritize evaluation of U.S. dollar-denominated, fully reserved
stablecoins issued by entities subject to regulatory oversight. In evaluating digital assets, the
Department shall prioritize assets designed for payment functionality and price stability and shall
not evaluate digital collectibles or non-fungible tokens.
SECTION 4.(c) Limitations. – Nothing in this act does any of the following:
(1) Requires any State agency to accept digital assets.
(2) Authorizes any State agency to hold, invest in, or retain digital assets.
(3) Authorizes the State to directly custody, invest in, or speculate in digital
assets.
(4) Designates any digital asset as legal tender.
(5) Authorizes acceptance of digital assets for taxes or criminal fines.
SECTION 4.(d) Report. – The Department of State Treasurer shall submit a written
report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government and the Fiscal
Page 2 Senate Bill 975-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Research Division no later than January 15, 2027, summarizing findings and providing
recommendations regarding whether and under what conditions the State should consider
accepting digital assets for certain State fees.
SECTION 5.(a) International Payments and Household Remittance Study. – The
Department of State Treasurer, in consultation with the Office of the Commissioner of Banks,
shall conduct a comprehensive study of household remittance payments made by North Carolina
residents, including international and cross-border consumer payment systems.
SECTION 5.(b) Scope. – The study required by this section includes, at a minimum,
evaluation of the following:
(1) Average fees, foreign exchange spreads, and transaction costs incurred by
households using traditional remittance and money transfer services.
(2) Market structure and competition within the remittance and international
payments industry.
(3) Consumer protection, fraud risk, and financial crime considerations.
(4) Regulatory frameworks governing cross-border payments under State and
federal law.
(5) The potential role of digital payment platforms, blockchain-based payment
systems, and distributed ledger technologies in reducing transaction costs.
(6) The potential role of U.S. dollar-denominated, fully reserved stablecoins and
other regulated digital settlement instruments.
(7) Financial inclusion impacts, including access for unbanked and underbanked
populations.
(8) Risks to financial stability, data security, privacy, and consumer safeguards.
SECTION 5.(c) Report. – The Department of State Treasurer shall submit a written
report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government and the Fiscal
Research Division summarizing the findings of this study and providing policy recommendations
regarding potential mechanisms to reduce household remittance costs for North Carolina
residents, consistent with consumer protection, financial stability, and regulatory compliance.
SECTION 6. Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Department of State Treasurer the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to implement the studies required by this act, including research,
interagency coordination, technical consultation, and preparation of the reports required under
this act. Funds appropriated pursuant to this section shall not be used to procure, purchase, hold,
invest in, or otherwise acquire digital assets.
SECTION 7. Effective Date. – This act is effective when it becomes law.
Senate Bill 975-First Edition Page 3